en: Brake pad compatible rotor type: Any rotor type; Drilled; Drilled & slotted; Plain/blank; Slotted; Other
sk-SK: Typ rotora kompatibilný s brzdovými doštičkami: Akýkoľvek typ kotúča; Vŕtaný; Vŕtaný a drážkovaný; Hladký/bez úprav; Drážkovaný; Iný
ro-RO: Tipul de rotor compatibil cu plăcuțele de frână: Orice tip de disc; Perforat; Perforat și striat; Simplu/neted; Striat; Altele
hu: Fékbetéttel kompatibilis féktárcsatípus: Bármilyen típusú féktárcsa; Fúrt; Fúrt és mart; Sima/minta nélküli; Mart; Egyéb
ru: Тип ротора, совместимый с тормозной колодкой: Любой тип ротора; С перфорацией; С перфорацией и слотированием; Гладкий; С насечками; Другое
sl-SI: Tip rotorja, združljiv z zavornimi ploščicami: Katerakoli vrsta rotorja; Vrtani; Vrtani in zarezani; Ravni/gladki; Zarezani; Drugo
da: Type af kompatibel bremseklods (rotor): Enhver type bremseskive; Boret; Boret og rillet; Almindelig/blank; Rillet; Andet
lt-LT: Su stabdžių kaladėlėmis suderinamas rotoriaus tipas: Bet koks rotoriaus tipas; Išgręžtas; Išgręžtas ir su grioveliais; Paprastas / be rašto; Su grioveliais; Kitas
zh-TW: 煞車片相容型轉子類型: 任何煞車盤類型; 鑽孔式; 鑽孔劃線式; 素面/無孔無線; 劃線式; 其他
vi: Loại rôto tương thích với má phanh: Bất kỳ loại rô-to nào; Khoan lỗ; Khoan lỗ & có rãnh; Trơn/không rãnh; Có rãnh; Khác
ko: 브레이크 패드 호환 로터 유형: 모든 로터 유형; 드릴드; 드릴드 및 슬롯; 플레인/블랭크; 슬롯; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de rotor compatível com a pastilha de freio: Qualquer tipo de disco; Perfurado; Perfurado e ranhurado; Liso/sólido; Ranhurado; Outro
nb: Bremseklosskompatibel rotortype: Alle rotortyper; Boret; Boret og slisset; Slett/blank; Slisset; Annet
ja: ブレーキパッド対応ロータータイプ: 任意のロータータイプ; ドリルド; ドリルド＆スリット; プレーン/無地; スリット; その他
cs: Typ brzdového kotouče kompatibilní s brzdovými destičkami: Jakýkoli typ kotouče; Vrtaný; Vrtaný a drážkovaný; Hladký/plný; Drážkovaný; Jiné
pt-PT: Tipo de rotor compatível com pastilha de travão: Qualquer tipo de rotor; Perfurado; Perfurado e ranhurado; Liso/simples; Ranhurado; Outro
pl: Kompatybilny typ tarczy hamulcowej: Dowolny typ tarczy; Nawiercane; Nawiercane i nacinane; Płaskie/gładkie; Nacinane; Inne
tr: Fren balatası uyumlu rotor tipi: Herhangi bir rotor tipi; Delikli; Delikli ve oluklu; Düz/boş; Oluklu; Diğer
hr-HR: Tip rotora kompatibilan s kočionim pločicama: Bilo koji tip diska; Izbušen; Izbušen i s utorima; Ravni/prazni; S utorima; Ostalo
it: Tipo di rotore compatibile con pastiglie freno: Qualsiasi tipo di disco; Forato; Forato e baffato; Liscio/non forato; Baffato; Altro
es: Tipo de rotor compatible con la pastilla de freno: Cualquier tipo de rotor; Perforado; Perforado y ranurado; Liso; Ranurado; Otro
bg-BG: Съвместим тип ротор за спирачни накладки: Всеки тип ротор; Надупчен; Перфориран и нарязан; Гладък/плътен; Нарязан; Други
th: ประเภทจานเบรกที่เข้ากันได้กับผ้าเบรก: จานเบรกทุกประเภท; เจาะรู; เจาะรูและเซาะร่อง; เรียบ/ไม่มีรอยเจาะ; เซาะร่อง; อื่นๆ
nl: Remblok compatibel met dit type remschijf: Elk type remschijf; Geboord; Geboord en gegroefd; Effen/blanco; Gegroefd; Overig
fr: Type de disque compatible avec les plaquettes de frein: Tout type de disque; Perforé; Perforé et rainuré; Lisse/plein; Rainuré; Autre
el: Τύπος ρότορα συμβατού με τακάκια φρένων: Κάθε τύπος δισκόπλακας; Τρυπητή; Τρυπητή και χαρακωτή; Απλή/χωρίς οπές; Χαρακωτή; Άλλο
de: Mit dem Bremsbelag kompatibler Rotortyp: Alle Bremsscheibentypen; Gelocht; Gelocht und geschlitzt; Glatt/unbehandelt; Geschlitzt; Sonstige
sv: Bromsbeläggskompatibel rotortyp: Alla bromsskivor; Borrad; Borrad och slitsad; Slät/blank; Slitsad; Övrigt
fi: Jarrupalojen kanssa yhteensopiva roottorityyppi: Mikä tahansa levytyyppi; Rei'itetty; Rei'itetty ja uritettu; Tasainen/sileä; Uritettu; Muu
zh-CN: 刹车片适配转子类型: 任意刹车盘类型; 打孔; 打孔及划线; 光面/空白; 划线; 其他